test/src/morphology/N-durak_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - durak e-stem tomppeli: # Noun - full paradigm
     durak+N+Sg+Nom: durak
     durak+N+Sg+Gen: duraak
     durak+N+Sg+Acc: duraak
     durak+N+Sg+Ill: durakka
     durak+N+Sg+Loc: duraakast
     durak+N+Sg+Com: duraakin
     durak+N+Ess: duraaken
     durak+N+Par: duraaked
     durak+N+Sg+Abe: duraaktää
     durak+N+Pl+Nom: duraak
     durak+N+Pl+Gen: duraaki
     durak+N+Pl+Acc: duraakid
     durak+N+Pl+Ill: duraakid
     durak+N+Pl+Loc: duraakin
     durak+N+Pl+Com: duraakivuiˊm
     durak+N+Pl+Abe: duraakitää
